viceverser/data/fr_ud.aff
FLAG long
SFX yC Y 47
SFX yC ire ire/ dire  is:infi
SFX yC ire isant/ dire  is:ppre
SFX yC ire it/ dire  is:ppas po:adj is:mas is:sg
SFX yC ire its/ dire  is:ppas po:adj is:mas is:pl
SFX yC ire ite/ dire  is:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg
SFX yC ire it·e/ dire  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:sg
SFX yC ire ites/ dire  is:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl
SFX yC ire it·es/ dire  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:pl
SFX yC ire is/ dire  is:ipre is:ipsi is:1sg is:2sg
SFX yC ire it/ dire  is:ipre is:ipsi is:3sg
SFX yC ire isons/ dire  is:ipre is:1pl
SFX yC ire ites/ dire  is:ipre is:2pl
SFX yC ire isent/ dire  is:ipre is:spre is:3pl
SFX yC ire isais/ dire  is:iimp is:1sg is:2sg
SFX yC ire isait/ dire  is:iimp is:3sg
SFX yC ire isions/ dire  is:iimp is:spre is:1pl
SFX yC ire isiez/ dire  is:iimp is:spre is:2pl
SFX yC ire isaient/ dire  is:iimp is:3pl
SFX yC ire îmes/ dire  is:ipsi is:1pl
SFX yC ire îtes/ dire  is:ipsi is:2pl
SFX yC ire irent/ dire  is:ipsi is:3pl!
SFX yC ire irai/ dire  is:ifut is:1sg
SFX yC ire iras/ dire  is:ifut is:2sg
SFX yC ire ira/ dire  is:ifut is:3sg
SFX yC ire irons/ dire  is:ifut is:1pl
SFX yC ire irez/ dire  is:ifut is:2pl
SFX yC ire iront/ dire  is:ifut is:3pl!
SFX yC ire irais/ dire  is:cond is:1sg is:2sg
SFX yC ire irait/ dire  is:cond is:3sg
SFX yC ire irions/ dire  is:cond is:1pl
SFX yC ire iriez/ dire  is:cond is:2pl
SFX yC ire iraient/ dire  is:cond is:3pl
SFX yC ire ise/ dire  is:spre is:1sg is:3sg
SFX yC ire ises/ dire  is:spre is:2sg
SFX yC ire isse/ dire  is:simp is:1sg
SFX yC ire isses/ dire  is:simp is:2sg
SFX yC ire ît/ dire  is:simp is:3sg
SFX yC ire issions/ dire  is:simp is:1pl
SFX yC ire issiez/ dire  is:simp is:2pl
SFX yC ire issent/ dire  is:simp is:3pl
SFX yC ire is/ dire  is:impe is:2sg
SFX yC ire isons/ dire  is:impe is:1pl
SFX yC ire ites/ dire  is:impe is:2pl
SFX yC ire it-e/ dire  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:sg
SFX yC ire it-es/ dire  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:pl
SFX yC ire it·e·s/ dire  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:pl
SFX yC ire it-e-s/ dire  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:pl

SFX yD Y 47
SFX yD dire dire/ dire  is:infi
SFX yD dire disant/ dire  is:ppre
SFX yD dire dit/ dire  is:ppas po:adj is:mas is:sg
SFX yD dire dits/ dire  is:ppas po:adj is:mas is:pl
SFX yD dire dite/ dire  is:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg
SFX yD dire dit·e/ dire  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:sg
SFX yD dire dites/ dire  is:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl
SFX yD dire dit·es/ dire  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:pl
SFX yD dire dis/ dire  is:ipre is:ipsi is:1sg is:2sg
SFX yD dire dit/ dire  is:ipre is:ipsi is:3sg
SFX yD dire disons/ dire  is:ipre is:1pl
SFX yD dire disez/ dire  is:ipre is:2pl
SFX yD dire disent/ dire  is:ipre is:spre is:3pl
SFX yD dire disais/ dire  is:iimp is:1sg is:2sg
SFX yD dire disait/ dire  is:iimp is:3sg
SFX yD dire disions/ dire  is:iimp is:spre is:1pl
SFX yD dire disiez/ dire  is:iimp is:spre is:2pl
SFX yD dire disaient/ dire  is:iimp is:3pl
SFX yD dire dîmes/ dire  is:ipsi is:1pl
SFX yD dire dîtes/ dire  is:ipsi is:2pl
SFX yD dire dirent/ dire  is:ipsi is:3pl!
SFX yD dire dirai/ dire  is:ifut is:1sg
SFX yD dire diras/ dire  is:ifut is:2sg
SFX yD dire dira/ dire  is:ifut is:3sg
SFX yD dire dirons/ dire  is:ifut is:1pl
SFX yD dire direz/ dire  is:ifut is:2pl
SFX yD dire diront/ dire  is:ifut is:3pl!
SFX yD dire dirais/ dire  is:cond is:1sg is:2sg
SFX yD dire dirait/ dire  is:cond is:3sg
SFX yD dire dirions/ dire  is:cond is:1pl
SFX yD dire diriez/ dire  is:cond is:2pl
SFX yD dire diraient/ dire  is:cond is:3pl
SFX yD dire dise/ dire  is:spre is:1sg is:3sg
SFX yD dire dises/ dire  is:spre is:2sg
SFX yD dire disse/ dire  is:simp is:1sg
SFX yD dire disses/ dire  is:simp is:2sg
SFX yD dire dît/ dire  is:simp is:3sg
SFX yD dire dissions/ dire  is:simp is:1pl
SFX yD dire dissiez/ dire  is:simp is:2pl
SFX yD dire dissent/ dire  is:simp is:3pl
SFX yD dire dis/ dire  is:impe is:2sg
SFX yD dire disons/ dire  is:impe is:1pl
SFX yD dire disez/ dire  is:impe is:2pl
SFX yD dire dit-e/ dire  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:sg
SFX yD dire dit-es/ dire  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:pl
SFX yD dire dit·e·s/ dire  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:pl
SFX yD dire dit-e-s/ dire  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:pl

SFX yE Y 38
SFX yE édire édire/ édire  is:infi
SFX yE édire édisant/ édire  is:ppre
SFX yE édire édit/ édire  is:ppas is:epi is:inv
SFX yE édire édis/ édire  is:ipre is:ipsi is:1sg is:2sg
SFX yE édire édit/ édire  is:ipre is:ipsi is:3sg
SFX yE édire édisons/ édire  is:ipre is:1pl
SFX yE édire édisez/ édire  is:ipre is:2pl
SFX yE édire édisent/ édire  is:ipre is:spre is:3pl
SFX yE édire édisais/ édire  is:iimp is:1sg is:2sg
SFX yE édire édisait/ édire  is:iimp is:3sg
SFX yE édire édisions/ édire  is:iimp is:spre is:1pl
SFX yE édire édisiez/ édire  is:iimp is:spre is:2pl
SFX yE édire édisaient/ édire  is:iimp is:3pl
SFX yE édire édîmes/ édire  is:ipsi is:1pl
SFX yE édire édîtes/ édire  is:ipsi is:2pl
SFX yE édire édirent/ édire  is:ipsi is:3pl!
SFX yE édire édirai/ édire  is:ifut is:1sg
SFX yE édire édiras/ édire  is:ifut is:2sg
SFX yE édire édira/ édire  is:ifut is:3sg
SFX yE édire édirons/ édire  is:ifut is:1pl
SFX yE édire édirez/ édire  is:ifut is:2pl
SFX yE édire édiront/ édire  is:ifut is:3pl!
SFX yE édire édirais/ édire  is:cond is:1sg is:2sg
SFX yE édire édirait/ édire  is:cond is:3sg
SFX yE édire édirions/ édire  is:cond is:1pl
SFX yE édire édiriez/ édire  is:cond is:2pl
SFX yE édire édiraient/ édire  is:cond is:3pl
SFX yE édire édise/ édire  is:spre is:1sg is:3sg
SFX yE édire édises/ édire  is:spre is:2sg
SFX yE édire édisse/ édire  is:simp is:1sg
SFX yE édire édisses/ édire  is:simp is:2sg
SFX yE édire édît/ édire  is:simp is:3sg
SFX yE édire édissions/ édire  is:simp is:1pl
SFX yE édire édissiez/ édire  is:simp is:2pl
SFX yE édire édissent/ édire  is:simp is:3pl
SFX yE édire édis/ édire  is:impe is:2sg
SFX yE édire édisons/ édire  is:impe is:1pl
SFX yE édire édisez/ édire  is:impe is:2pl
